Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2342
General residuary clause; construction that will passes all property; after-acquired property.

Except as provided in section 30-2348, a general residuary clause in a will or a will making general disposition of all of the property of the testator is construed to pass all property which the testator owns at his death including property acquired after the execution of the will.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 64, UPC § 2-604.